Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB675.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7390. Firefighting personal protective equipment.(a) Prohibition.--Except as provided in subsection (b), beginning January 1, 2028, a person may not distribute, manufacture, offer for sale, produce or sell in this Commonwealth, or for use in this Commonwealth, firefighting personal protective equipment that contains an intentionally added PFAS chemical.(b) Exception.--The prohibition under subsection (a) shall not apply to the distribution, manufacture, offer, production or 1234567891011121314151617 sale of firefighting personal protective equipment if the State Fire Commissioner has determined that the use of a PFAS chemical in the firefighting personal protective equipment is unavoidable and has issued guidance to that effect. The State Fire Commissioner shall transmit notice of the determination and guidance to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(c) Enforcement.--The Attorney General shall enforce the provisions of this section.(d) Violations.--(1) For a first violation of this section, a person shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000.(2) For a second or subsequent violation of this section, a person shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 for each violation.(3) All fines or penalties collected under this section shall be transferred as follows:(i) 50% to the Fire Company Grant Program established under section 7811 (relating to establishment).(ii) 50% to the Emergency Medical Services Grant Program established under section 7821 (relating to establishment).(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Firefighting personal protective equipment." Any items or clothing designed, intended or marketed to be worn by firefighting personnel in the performance of their duties during fire and rescue activities, including jackets, pants, shoes, 20250HB0675PN0689 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 gloves, helmets and respiratory equipment."PFAS chemical." A fluorinated organic chemical that contains any member of the class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom, including perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0675PN0689 - 3 - 123456